Massachusetts, session 194th, H4295.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 17 of chapter 61A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting, after the first sentence, the following: - 
Notwithstanding the provisions in this section, if, by conveyance or other action of the 
owner thereof, a portion of land previously used primarily and directly for agricultural purposes 
pursuant to section 1 or land used primarily and directly for horticultural use pursuant to section 
2, which is valued, assessed and taxed under the provisions of this chapter is separated to serve 
as the site of a renewable energy generating source, as defined in subsection (b) of section 11F of 
chapter 25A of the General Laws, the land so separated shall not be subject to liability for 
conveyance for such time as the separated land is in use for the purpose of producing a 
renewable energy generating source. Such land shall instead be subject to the payment of fifty 
percent of the applicable roll-back taxes to be due payable at the time it commences serving as 
the site of a renewable energy generating source; provided that such land is non-productive 
agricultural or horticultural land at the time of the proposed separation. Should the use of 
separated land as a renewable energy generating source permanently cease, and the land is not 

of 2 15 placed back into agricultural use or horticultural use, then the land shall be subject to liability for 
conveyance applicable thereto at the time its use as a renewable energy generating source 
permanently ceases. Any portion of land separated subject to this provision shall not exceed ten 
percent of the total amount of contiguous land; provided that such separated land shall not 
exceed fifteen acres of the land which is valued, assessed and taxed under the provisions of this 
chapter at the time such land is separated to serve as the site of a renewable energy generating 
source.